Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-921
Retirement system; membership; termination; reinstatement; repayment of accumulated contributions; exception.

(1) The membership of any person in the retirement system shall cease only if he or she (a) withdraws his or her accumulated contributions under section 79-955, (b) retires on a school or formula or disability retirement allowance, or (c) dies.

(2) The retirement board shall reinstate to membership, with the same status as when such membership ceased, a school employee who has withdrawn his or her accumulated contributions under the following conditions:

(a) If he or she again becomes an employee and if such employee chooses within three years after rejoining the system to repay, within five years after the date on which he or she rejoins the retirement system or prior to termination of employment, whichever is first, to the retirement board part or all of the amount he or she has withdrawn plus interest which would have accrued on that amount under the retirement system; or

(b) If, more than three years after again becoming an employee and rejoining the system but prior to termination of employment, he or she chooses to repay part or all of the amount he or she has withdrawn, plus an amount equal to the actuarial assumed rate of return for the period repaid. Payment must be completed within five years after electing to repay or prior to termination, whichever is earlier.

(3) Prior creditable service shall be restored in proportion to the amounts repaid. A member's prior creditable service shall be fully restored only if the member has repaid all accumulated withdrawals in accordance with either subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this section, as applicable. Repayment may be made through direct payment, installment payments, or an irrevocable payroll deduction authorization. If the school employee chooses not to repay such withdrawals with interest, the school employee shall enter the system as a new member with no prior rights.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 14, p. 643;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2914;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 448, p. 845;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 4, p. 2778;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1514;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 556;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 703, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 24.